Washington statutes.
RCW 30A.04.260

Legal services, advertising of—Penalty.

(1) No person, other than an attorney-at-law or law firm as permitted by other law, which advertises that it will furnish legal advice, construct or prepare wills, or do other legal work for its customers, shall be permitted to act as executor, administrator, or guardian; and such person whose officers or agents shall solicit legal business shall be ineligible for a period of one year thereafter to be appointed executor, administrator, or guardian in any of the courts of this state.

(2) Any person authorized under this title or Title 30B RCW to engage in a trust business, which advertises that it will furnish legal advice, construct or prepare wills, or do other legal work for its customers, and any officer, agent, or employee of such person who shall solicit legal business is guilty of a gross misdemeanor.

[ 2014 c 37 s 127; 2013 c 76 s 7; 2003 c 53 s 185; 1974 ex.s. c 117 s 43; 1955 c 33 s 30.04.260. Prior: 1929 c 72 s 4, part; 1923 c 115 s 6, part; 1921 c 94 s 1, part; 1917 c 80 s 24, part; RRS s 3231, part. Formerly RCW 30.04.260.]

NOTES:

Intent—Effective date—2003 c 53: See notes following RCW 2.48.180.

Application, construction—Severability—Effective date—1974 ex.s. c 117: See RCW 11.02.080 and notes following.